North Carolina, session 2025, SB495.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Part 1 of Article 9 of Chapter 160D of the General Statutes is
amended by adding a new section to read:
"§ 160D-917. Accessory dwelling units.
(a) A local government shall allow the development of at least one accessory dwelling
unit which conforms to the North Carolina Residential Code for One- and Two-Family
Dwellings, including applicable provisions from fire prevention codes, for each single-family
detached dwelling in areas zoned for residential use that allow for development of single-family
detached dwellings. An accessory dwelling unit may be built or sited concurrently or after the
primary single-family detached dwelling has been constructed or sited. Nothing in this section
shall prohibit a local government from permitting accessory dwelling units in any area not
otherwise required under this section.
(b) In permitting accessory dwelling units under this section, a local government shall
not do any of the following:
(1) Prohibit the use of the primary single-family detached dwelling and the
accessory dwelling for long-term rentals by separate households.
(2) Require placement in a conditional zoning district.
(3) Establish minimum parking requirements or other parking restrictions,
including imposition of additional parking requirements where an existing
structure is converted for use as an accessory dwelling unit.
(4) Prohibit the connection of the accessory dwelling unit to existing utilities
systems serving the primary single-family detached dwelling, provided the
utility service to that primary single-family detached dwelling has capacity to
serve both dwellings.
(5) Charge any fees in excess of those charged for the permitting of a
single-family detached dwelling similar in nature.
(6) Set a maximum accessory dwelling unit size of less than 800 square feet.
(c) A local government may do any of the following:
(1) Impose a setback minimum for accessory dwelling units of 10 feet or the
setback minimum imposed generally upon lots in the same zoning
classification, whichever is less.
(2) Require that accessory dwelling units be located to the side or rear of the
primary single-family detached dwelling.
*S495-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(3) Require that accessory dwelling units be smaller than the primary
single-family detached dwelling.
(d) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a local government may regulate
accessory dwelling units pursuant to this Chapter and nothing in this section shall be construed
to impair the authority of a local government to adopt and enforce ordinances pursuant to Part 2
of this Article to comply with State and federal law, rules, and regulations, or permits consistent
with the interpretations and directions of the State or federal agency issuing the permit.
(e) Nothing in this section shall apply to any of the following:
(1) The validity or enforceability of private covenants or other contractual
agreements among property owners related to dwelling type restrictions.
(2) Properties located in a historic preservation district established pursuant to
Part 4 of this Article.
(3) Properties designated as a National Historic Landmark by the United States
Department of Interior.
(4) An accessory dwelling unit that is not connected to water and sewer.
(f) For the purposes of this section, the term "accessory dwelling unit" means an attached
or detached residential structure that is used in connection with, or that is an accessory to, a
primary single-family detached dwelling and that has less total square footage than the primary
single-family detached dwelling."
SECTION 1.(b) This section becomes effective October 1, 2025, and applies to
applications for accessory dwelling unit permits submitted on or after that date.
SECTION 1.(c) A local government that has enacted an ordinance that meets the
requirements of this act and G.S. 160D-917, as enacted by this act, is not required to adopt a new
ordinance.
SECTION 2. Local governments shall adopt development regulations to implement
the provisions in this act no later than January 1, 2027. If a local government fails to adopt
development regulations as required by this act by January 1, 2027, accessory dwelling units
shall be allowed in that local government without any limitations.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 495-First Edition